Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AMENDMENT TO STATE FIRE CODE.new text end new text begin (a) The state fire marshal, in collaboration with stakeholders and other experts in the field, shall consider amending the State Fire Code to require sealed batteries for smoke alarms in dwelling units. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2027, the fire marshal shall come to a decision on whether an amendment to the State Fire Code is appropriate and, if so, begin the process to amend the code so that the change is implemented in the next revision of the code. The fire marshal shall notify the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over fire safety on the fire marshal's decision after it is reached. new text end